dicts/hsb/hsb.aff
SFX j Y 60
SFX j 0 ja [^j]
SFX j 0 jej [^j]
SFX j 0 jom [^j]
SFX j 0 ju [^j]
SFX j 0 je [^j]
SFX j 0 jow [^j]
SFX j 0 jomaj [^j]
SFX j 0 jam [^j]
SFX j 0 jemi [^j]
SFX j 0 jach [^j]
SFX j 0 a [^i]j
SFX j 0 ej [^i]j
SFX j 0 om [^i]j
SFX j 0 u [^i]j
SFX j 0 o [^i]j
SFX j 0 ow [^i]j
SFX j 0 omaj [^i]j
SFX j 0 am [^i]j
SFX j 0 emi [^i]j
SFX j 0 ach [^i]j
SFX j 0 owy [^i]j
SFX j 0 owa [^i]j
SFX j 0 owe [^i]j
SFX j 0 oweho [^i]j
SFX j 0 oweje [^i]j
SFX j 0 owemu [^i]j
SFX j 0 owej [^i]j
SFX j 0 owym [^i]j
SFX j 0 owu [^i]j
SFX j 0 owaj [^i]j
SFX j 0 oweju [^i]j
SFX j 0 owymaj [^i]j
SFX j 0 owi [^i]j
SFX j 0 owych [^i]j
SFX j 0 owymi [^i]j
SFX j ij ja ij
SFX j ij jej ij
SFX j ij jom ij
SFX j ij ju ij
SFX j ij jo ij
SFX j ij jow ij
SFX j ij jomaj ij
SFX j ij jam ij
SFX j ij jemi ij
SFX j ij jach ij
SFX j ij owy ij
SFX j ij owa ij
SFX j ij owe ij
SFX j ij oweho ij
SFX j ij oweje ij
SFX j ij owemu ij
SFX j ij owej ij
SFX j ij owym ij
SFX j ij owu ij
SFX j ij owaj ij
SFX j ij oweju ij
SFX j ij owymaj ij
SFX j ij owi ij
SFX j ij owych ij
SFX j ij owymi ij

SFX l Y 283
SFX l ósć osće kósć
SFX l ósć osći kósć
SFX l ósć osću kósć
SFX l ósć osćow kósć
SFX l ósć osćomaj kósć
SFX l ósć osćam kósć
SFX l ósć osćemi kósć
SFX l ósć osćach kósć
SFX l ósć osćowy kósć
SFX l ósć osćowa kósć
SFX l ósć osćowe kósć
SFX l ósć osćoweho kósć
SFX l ósć osćoweje kósć
SFX l ósć osćowemu kósć
SFX l ósć osćowej kósć
SFX l ósć osćowym kósć
SFX l ósć osćowu kósć
SFX l ósć osćowaj kósć
SFX l ósć osćoweju kósć
SFX l ósć osćowymaj kósć
SFX l ósć osćowi kósć
SFX l ósć osćowych kósć
SFX l ósć osćowymi kósć
SFX l ód oda ód
SFX l ód odej ód
SFX l ód odom ód
SFX l ód odźe ód
SFX l ód odaj ód
SFX l ód odow ód
SFX l ód odomaj ód
SFX l ód ody ód
SFX l ód odam ód
SFX l ód odami ód
SFX l ód odach ód
SFX l ód odowy ód
SFX l ód odowa ód
SFX l ód odowe ód
SFX l ód odoweho ód
SFX l ód odoweje ód
SFX l ód odowemu ód
SFX l ód odowej ód
SFX l ód odowym ód
SFX l ód odowu ód
SFX l ód odowaj ód
SFX l ód odoweju ód
SFX l ód odowymaj ód
SFX l ód odowi ód
SFX l ód odowych ód
SFX l ód odowymi ód
SFX l ót ota ót
SFX l ót otej ót
SFX l ót otom ót
SFX l ót oće ót
SFX l ót otaj ót
SFX l ót otow ót
SFX l ót otomaj ót
SFX l ót oty ót
SFX l ót otam ót
SFX l ót otami ót
SFX l ót otach ót
SFX l ót otowy ót
SFX l ót otowa ót
SFX l ót otowe ót
SFX l ót otoweho ót
SFX l ót otoweje ót
SFX l ót otowemu ót
SFX l ót otowej ót
SFX l ót otowym ót
SFX l ót otowu ót
SFX l ót otowaj ót
SFX l ót otoweju ót
SFX l ót otowymaj ót
SFX l ót otowi ót
SFX l ót otowych ót
SFX l ót otowymi ót
SFX l ón ona ón
SFX l ón onej ón
SFX l ón onom ón
SFX l ón onje ón
SFX l ón onaj ón
SFX l ón onow ón
SFX l ón onomaj ón
SFX l ón ony ón
SFX l ón onam ón
SFX l ón onami ón
SFX l ón onach ón
SFX l ón onowy ón
SFX l ón onowa ón
SFX l ón onowe ón
SFX l ón onoweho ón
SFX l ón onoweje ón
SFX l ón onowemu ón
SFX l ón onowej ón
SFX l ón onowym ón
SFX l ón onowu ón
SFX l ón onowaj ón
SFX l ón onoweju ón
SFX l ón onowymaj ón
SFX l ón onowi ón
SFX l ón onowych ón
SFX l ón onowymi ón
SFX l óz oza óz
SFX l óz ozej óz
SFX l óz ozom óz
SFX l óz ozu óz
SFX l óz ozaj óz
SFX l óz ozow óz
SFX l óz ozomaj óz
SFX l óz ozy óz
SFX l óz ozam óz
SFX l óz ozami óz
SFX l óz ozach óz
SFX l óz ozowy óz
SFX l óz ozowa óz
SFX l óz ozowe óz
SFX l óz ozoweho óz
SFX l óz ozoweje óz
SFX l óz ozowemu óz
SFX l óz ozowej óz
SFX l óz ozowym óz
SFX l óz ozowu óz
SFX l óz ozowaj óz
SFX l óz ozoweju óz
SFX l óz ozowymaj óz
SFX l óz ozowi óz
SFX l óz ozowych óz
SFX l óz ozowymi óz
SFX l óž oža óž
SFX l óž ožej óž
SFX l óž ožom óž
SFX l óž ožu óž
SFX l óž ožaj óž
SFX l óž ožow óž
SFX l óž ožomaj óž
SFX l óž ožy óž
SFX l óž ožam óž
SFX l óž ožami óž
SFX l óž ožach óž
SFX l óž ožowy óž
SFX l óž ožowa óž
SFX l óž ožowe óž
SFX l óž ožoweho óž
SFX l óž ožoweje óž
SFX l óž ožowemu óž
SFX l óž ožowej óž
SFX l óž ožowym óž
SFX l óž ožowu óž
SFX l óž ožowaj óž
SFX l óž ožoweju óž
SFX l óž ožowymaj óž
SFX l óž ožowi óž
SFX l óž ožowych óž
SFX l óž ožowymi óž
SFX l ós osa ós
SFX l ós osej ós
SFX l ós osom ós
SFX l ós osu ós
SFX l ós osaj ós
SFX l ós osow ós
SFX l ós osomaj ós
SFX l ós osy ós
SFX l ós osam ós
SFX l ós osami ós
SFX l ós osach ós
SFX l ós osowy ós
SFX l ós osowa ós
SFX l ós osowe ós
SFX l ós osoweho ós
SFX l ós osoweje ós
SFX l ós osowemu ós
SFX l ós osowej ós
SFX l ós osowym ós
SFX l ós osowu ós
SFX l ós osowaj ós
SFX l ós osoweju ós
SFX l ós osowymaj ós
SFX l ós osowi ós
SFX l ós osowych ós
SFX l ós osowymi ós
SFX l óń onja óń
SFX l óń onjej óń
SFX l óń onjom óń
SFX l óń onju óń
SFX l óń onjow óń
SFX l óń onjomaj óń
SFX l óń onjy óń
SFX l óń onjam óń
SFX l óń onjemi óń
SFX l óń onjach óń
SFX l óń onjowy óń
SFX l óń onjowa óń
SFX l óń onjowe óń
SFX l óń onjoweho óń
SFX l óń onjoweje óń
SFX l óń onjowemu óń
SFX l óń onjowej óń
SFX l óń onjowym óń
SFX l óń onjowu óń
SFX l óń onjowaj óń
SFX l óń onjoweju óń
SFX l óń onjowymaj óń
SFX l óń onjowi óń
SFX l óń onjowych óń
SFX l óń onjowymi óń
SFX l óh oha óh
SFX l óh ohej óh
SFX l óh ohom óh
SFX l óh ohu óh
SFX l óh oze óh
SFX l óh ohaj óh
SFX l óh ohow óh
SFX l óh ohomaj óh
SFX l óh ohojo óh
SFX l óh oham óh
SFX l óh ohami óh
SFX l óh ohach óh
SFX l óh ohowy óh
SFX l óh ohowa óh
SFX l óh ohowe óh
SFX l óh ohoweho óh
SFX l óh ohoweje óh
SFX l óh ohowemu óh
SFX l óh ohowej óh
SFX l óh ohowym óh
SFX l óh ohowu óh
SFX l óh ohowaj óh
SFX l óh ohoweju óh
SFX l óh ohowymaj óh
SFX l óh ohowi óh
SFX l óh ohowych óh
SFX l óh ohowymi óh
SFX l ór ora ór
SFX l ór orej ór
SFX l ór orom ór
SFX l ór orje ór
SFX l ór oraj ór
SFX l ór orow ór
SFX l ór oromaj ór
SFX l ór ory ór
SFX l ór oram ór
SFX l ór orami ór
SFX l ór orach ór
SFX l ór orowy ór
SFX l ór orowa ór
SFX l ór orowe ór
SFX l ór oroweho ór
SFX l ór oroweje ór
SFX l ór orowemu ór
SFX l ór orowej ór
SFX l ór orowym ór
SFX l ór orowu ór
SFX l ór orowaj ór
SFX l ór oroweju ór
SFX l ór orowymaj ór
SFX l ór orowi ór
SFX l ór orowych ór
SFX l ór orowymi ór
SFX l óst osta óst
SFX l óst ostej óst
SFX l óst ostom óst
SFX l óst osće óst
SFX l óst ostaj óst
SFX l óst ostow óst
SFX l óst ostomaj óst
SFX l óst osty óst
SFX l óst ostam óst
SFX l óst ostami óst
SFX l óst ostach óst
SFX l óst ostowy óst
SFX l óst ostowa óst
SFX l óst ostowe óst
SFX l óst ostoweho óst
SFX l óst ostoweje óst
SFX l óst ostowemu óst
SFX l óst ostowej óst
SFX l óst ostowym óst
SFX l óst ostowu óst
SFX l óst ostowaj óst
SFX l óst ostoweju óst
SFX l óst ostowymaj óst
SFX l óst ostowi óst
SFX l óst ostowych óst
SFX l óst ostowymi óst
